Washington statutes.
RCW 41.35.480

Vested membership.

A member who separates or has separated after having completed at least five years of service may remain a member during the period of such member's absence from service for the exclusive purpose only of receiving a retirement allowance under the provisions of RCW 41.35.420 if such member maintains the member's accumulated contributions intact.

[ 1998 c 341 s 109.]